Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Generally

I. General Consideration.

II. Public Buildings And Utilities.

III. Railroads.

A. In General.

B. Procedure.

C. Damages.

D. Court Order.

IV. Roads and Pipelines.

V. Ways Of Necessity.

§ 1-26-501.
Short title.

This act shall be cited as the “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act”.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, the power of eminent domain may be exercised only as provided by this act and the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure to the extent the Rules of Civil Procedure do not conflict with this act.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to condemnation of property, see Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 1-26-502(a)(vi).

Partial taking. —

The Wyoming Eminent Domain Act and the cases interpreting those provisions require that the homeowners whose homes were condemned by the county receive fair market value as just compensation for any property taken by the county or, for a partial taking, the greater of the property rights taken or the amount by which the fair market value of the property is diminished. Miller v. Campbell County, 901 P.2d 1107,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002); Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article,
“The More Things Change, The More Things Stay The Same: A Practitioner’s Guide to Recent Changes in Wyoming’s Eminent Domain Act” see
8 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jury trial under
Rule 71A(h) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure (Fed.Rules Civ. Proc., Rule 71A(h), 28 U.S.C.) in condemnation proceedings by United States,
164 ALR Fed 341.

§ 1-26-502.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Condemn” means to take property under the power of eminent domain;

“Condemnee” means a person who has or claims an interest in property that is the subject of a prospective or pending condemnation action;

“Condemnor” means a person empowered to condemn;

“Litigation expenses” means the reasonable costs, disbursements and expenses, including attorney, appraisal and engineering fees, associated with a condemnation proceeding;

“Public entity” means the state of Wyoming and its agencies, municipalities, counties, school districts, political subdivisions and special districts;

“This act” means W.S.

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Condemnor must show landlocked mineral ownership. —

Because an oil and gas company did not show mineral ownership that would qualify it as a condemnor, it should not have been permitted access to owners’ property; the legislature intended that only those entities with landlocked mineral ownership would have the power to condemn under the Eminent Domain Act. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-26-503.
Public use required; other acquisitions.

Nothing in this act requires that the power of eminent domain be exercised to acquire property. Whether property necessary for public use is to be acquired by purchase, other means or by eminent domain is a decision left to the discretion of the person authorized to acquire the property.

Subject to any other statute relating to the acquisition of property, any person or public entity authorized to acquire property for a particular use by eminent domain may also acquire the property for the use by grant, purchase, lease, gift, devise, contract or other means.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 1-26-502(a)(vi).

Municipality may acquire property by adverse possession. —

Although the legislature has expressly given municipalities the power to acquire property through eminent domain and statutory dedication, those two means are not exclusive. A municipality may, in appropriate circumstances, acquire real property by adverse possession or prescription. Koontz v. Superior, 746 P.2d 1264,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002); Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to condemn property in excess of needs for particular public purpose, 6 ALR3d 297.

§ 1-26-504.
Requirements to exercise eminent domain.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the power of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire property for a proposed use only if all of the following are established:

The public interest and necessity require the project or the use of eminent domain is authorized by the Wyoming Constitution;

The project is planned or located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury; and

The property sought to be acquired is necessary for the project.

Findings of the public service commission, the interstate commerce commission and other federal and state agencies with appropriate jurisdiction are prima facie valid relative to determinations under subsection (a) of this section if the findings were made in accordance with law with notice to condemnees who are parties to the condemnation action and are final with no appeals from the determinations pending.

When a public entity determines that there is a reasonable probability of locating a particular public project on specifically identifiable private property and that the project is expected to be completed within two (2) years of that determination, the public entity shall provide written notice of the intention to consider the location and construction of the project to the owner as shown on the records of the county assessor. The notice shall include a description of the public interest and necessity of the proposed project. The public entity shall provide an opportunity for the private property owners to consult and confer with representatives of the public entity regarding the project.

A condemnor shall prove each requirement of subsection (a) of this section by a preponderance of the evidence. Failure of the condemnor to prove any requirement of subsection (a) of this section shall result in dismissal of the condemnation action without prejudice.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2; 2013 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to taking of private property, see art. 1, § 32 and art. 10, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to public service commission, see §

37-2-101

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d).

Town does not fall within definition of “state agency,”

as defined in subsection (b), and, therefore, its condemnation action is subject to a more stringent review. Town of Wheatland v. Bellis Farms, 806 P.2d 281,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1991).

“Necessity.” —

The term “necessity,” when used in the context of an eminent domain proceeding, means “reasonably convenient or useful to the public”; a showing that the project will increase public safety is sufficient. Board of County Comm'rs v. Atter, 734 P.2d 549,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1987).

Burden of proof. —

Once a condemnor has established a prima facie case of public necessity, either by introducing its findings on the matter as provided in subsection (b) or by the production of evidence which factually supports its determination of public necessity, the burden then shifts to the condemnee who must then either concede the existence of a necessity or be prepared to show bad faith or abuse of discretion as an affirmative defense. Board of County Comm'rs v. Atter, 734 P.2d 549,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1987).

The language of subsection (a)(i) does not permit the district court to balance the competing interests. Once a town presents evidence that the project will increase safety, it has met its burden as to that particular determination. The burden then shifts to those opposing the condemnation to present evidence of bad faith or abuse of discretion. Town of Wheatland v. Bellis Farms, 806 P.2d 281,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1991).

Non-public power company demonstrated public interest and necessity.
—

In a condemnation action by a non-public power company, the company demonstrated public interest and necessity as required by Wyo. Stat Ann. § 1-26-504(a)(i) where the evidence plainly demonstrated the need for additional electric power to the energy corporation's service territory and that additional power would inure to the benefit of the public in that locality, both in terms of the additional power itself and the reliability of service in the area. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence showed direct reasonable route and least private harm.
—

In a condemnation action by a non-public power company, the company located the transmission line in a manner most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury as required by Wyo. Stat Ann. § 1-26-504(a)(ii) where the company devoted several years to examining several alternate routes, and the map demonstrated that the route chosen was, on its face, a direct and reasonable route. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence sufficient to show compliance. —

District court did not err in finding the condemnor board of county commissioners met all the requirements of the eminent domain statutes in seeking to condemn part of the condemnees' land in connection with a water system for a reservoir's recreational facilities where the board presented evidence that: 1) the project was in the public interest and necessary; 2) the water benefited many uses in an area accessed by members of the general public and private individuals; 3) although there might be ways to relocate the water system, at that time its use in place was compatible with the greatest public good; and 4) the condemnees failed to show bad faith or abuse of discretion on the part of the board. Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Railroad offered sufficient evidence that a 50-foot tract of land was needed to provide slope support for a railroad track and to allow construction of a fire break and access road, so the public necessity requirement for condemnation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-504(a) was satisfied. The evidence showed that the soils around the property were unstable and prone to failure and that the property was needed to achieve the recommended minimum standard for railroad slopes.
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Ry. Co. v. A 50-foot Wide Easement Consisting of 6.99 Acres More Or Less, 346 Fed. Appx. 297,

2009 U.S. App. LEXIS 19997

(10th Cir. 2009).

Existence of a contractual right to property does not preclude
action for eminent domain. —

A trial court erred when it dismissed a condemnation action brought against a landowner by a natural gas company because the gas company already had contractual access to the property which was the subject of an eminent domain proceeding; the existence of a lease agreement between property owners does not preclude an action for eminent domain if necessary to protect property interests or maintain facilities and improvement, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-504(a)(iii). Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

Evidence sufficient to show “substantial private harm.” —

Evidence showing that a town's airport runway extension project would cause 520 acres of irrigated farm land to suffer “substantial private harm” was sufficient to support a ruling that the town failed to locate or plan the project “in a manner most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.” Town of Wheatland v. Bellis Farms, 806 P.2d 281,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited in

Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Nov.
6, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article,
“The More Things Change, The More Things Stay The Same: A Practitioner’s Guide to Recent Changes in Wyoming’s Eminent Domain Act” see
8 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: possibility of overcoming specific obstacles to contemplated use as element in determining existence of necessary public use, 22 ALR4th 840.

Eminent domain: public taking of sports or entertainment franchise or organization as taking for public purpose, 30 ALR4th 1226.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

§ 1-26-505.
Condemnation of property devoted to a public use.

If a proposed use cannot be obtained under W.S.

1-26-813

, any condemnor may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property appropriated to public use if the proposed use will not unreasonably interfere with or impair the continuance of the public use as it then exists or may reasonably be expected to exist in the future. The burden of proving that a proposed use will not unreasonably interfere with or impair the continuance of the existing public use is on the prospective condemnor.

Where property is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the parties shall attempt to make an agreement determining the conditions upon which the property is taken and the manner and extent of its use by each of the parties. Except as otherwise provided by law, if the parties are unable to agree, the court shall fix the terms and conditions upon which the property is taken and the manner and extent of its use by each of the parties.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: review of electric power company's location of transmission line for which condemnation is sought, 19 ALR4th 1026.

§ 1-26-506.
Entry
prior to condemnation action.

A condemnor and its agents and employees may enter upon real property and make surveys, examinations, photographs, tests, soundings, borings and samplings, or engage in other activities for the purpose of appraising the property or determining whether it is suitable and within the power of the condemnor to condemn if the entry is:

Preceded by prior notice to the condemnee specifying the particular activity to be undertaken and the proposed use and potential recipient of the data thereby obtained and the condemnee has been given fifteen (15) days to grant written authorization;

Undertaken during reasonable hours, normally during daylight;

Accomplished peaceably and without inflicting substantial injury to land, crops, improvements, livestock or current business operations.

The entry and activities authorized by this section do not constitute a trespass.

The condemnor is liable under W.S.

1-26-508

for damages resulting from activities authorized by this section.

Subject to applicable confidentiality restrictions under federal or state law, the results of survey information acquired from the property sought related to threatened and endangered species, cultural resources and archeological resources shall be made available to the condemnee upon request.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(i) substituted “the condemnee specifying the particular activity to be undertaken and the proposed use and potential recipient of the data thereby obtained and the condemnee has been given fifteen (15) days to grant written authorization” for “and written authorization from the owner or his agent”; in (a)(iii) inserted “to land, crops, improvements, livestock or current business operations” at the end of the sentence; added (d).

Condemnor must show landlocked mineral ownership. —

Because an oil and gas company did not show mineral ownership that would qualify it as a condemnor, it should not have been permitted access to owners’ property; the legislature intended that only those entities with landlocked mineral ownership would have the power to condemn under the Eminent Domain Act. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Because a condemnor must be one that owns development rights to landlocked minerals, the access permitted under the statute is not intended to be a device by which an entity may obtain access to determine if it wants to acquire mineral ownership in the area; a party seeking access must show that it owns development rights and that the data it seeks to collect relates to that interest and will be used for its development. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Because an oil and gas company should not have been permitted access to owners’ property since it did not show mineral ownership, the data it collected was not lawfully in its possession, and it could not use it for any purpose; therefore, it was error to allow the company to use the data to support a condemnation action. EME Wyo., LLC v. BRW East, LLC, 2021 WY 64, 486 P.3d 980,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2021).

Violation of notice requirement. —

Although the district court held the condemnor board of county commissioners in contempt of its order permitting the condemnor to enter the condemnees' property to operate and maintain its water system but requiring the condemnor to give the condemnees notice prior to going onto the property, the condemnees were not entitled to attorney fees pursuant to this section where the district court made no findings that the board had violated the provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-508(b). Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
100.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-26-507.
Entry prior to condemnation action; court orders.

If reasonable efforts to accomplish a lawful entry or to perform authorized activities upon real property under W.S.

1-26-506

have been obstructed or denied the condemnor may apply to the district court for an order permitting entry.

Unless after notice and hearing good cause to the contrary is shown, the court shall make its order permitting and describing the purpose of the entry and setting forth the nature and scope of activities the court determines are reasonably necessary and authorized to be made upon the property. In addition to requiring a deposit under subsection (c) of this section, the order shall include terms and conditions with respect to the time, place and manner of entry and authorized activities upon the property which will facilitate the purpose of the entry and minimize damage, hardship and burden to the parties.

An order permitting entry under subsection (b) of this section shall include a determination by the court of the amount, if any, that will fairly compensate the owner or any other person in lawful possession or physical occupancy of the property for damages for physical injury to the property and for substantial interference with its possession or use, found likely to be caused by the entry and activities authorized by the order and shall require the condemnor to deposit cash or other security with the court before entry. The clerk of court shall invest any cash deposit in any legal interest bearing investment and the interest earnings shall accrue to the account of the condemnor. Unless sooner disbursed by court order, the cash or other security shall be retained on deposit for six (6) months following termination of the entry. The court for good cause may extend the period of retention.

After notice and hearing the court may modify an order under subsection (c) of this section. If a deposit is required or the amount required to be deposited is increased by an order of modification, the court shall specify the time within which the required amount must be deposited and may direct that any further entry or specified activities or studies under the order modified be stayed until the required deposit has been made.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Cited

in

Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

§ 1-26-508.
Entry prior to condemnation action; damages.

A condemnor is liable for physical injury to, and for substantial interference with possession or use of, property caused by his entry and activities upon the property. This liability may be enforced in a civil action against the condemnor or by application to the court as provided by subsection (c) of this section unless voluntarily paid by the condemnor.

In an action or other proceeding for recovery of damages under this section, the prevailing party shall be allowed his costs. In addition, the court shall award the condemnee his litigation expenses incurred in any proceeding under W.S.

1-26-507

if it finds that the condemnor:

Entered the property unlawfully;

Entered upon the property lawfully but thereafter engaged in activities upon the property which caused significant damage to the property not reasonably necessary to the purposes of the entry; or

Failed substantially to comply with an order made under W.S.

1-26-507

.

If funds are on deposit under W.S.

1-26-507

, the owner or other person entitled to damages under subsection (a) of this section may apply to the court for an award of the amount he is entitled to recover. The court shall determine the amount and award it to the person entitled thereto and direct that its payment be made out of the money on deposit. If the amount on deposit is insufficient to pay the full amount, the court shall enter judgment against the condemnor for the unpaid portion.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Condemnees not entitled to attorney fees. —

Although the district court held the condemnor board of county commissioners in contempt of its order permitting the condemnor to enter the condemnees' property to operate and maintain its water system but requiring the condemnor to give the condemnees notice prior to going onto the property, the condemnees were not entitled to attorney fees pursuant to this section where the district court made no findings that the board had violated the provisions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-26-508(b). Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eminent domain: compensability of loss of visibility of owner's property, 7 ALR5th 113.

Method of determining rate of interest allowed on award to owner of property taken by United States in eminent domain proceeding, 56 ALR Fed 477.

§ 1-26-509.
Negotiations; scope of efforts to purchase.

A condemnor shall make reasonable and diligent efforts to acquire property by good faith negotiation.

In attempting to acquire the property by purchase under W.S.

1-26-510

, the condemnor, acting within the scope of its powers and to the extent not otherwise forbidden by law, shall negotiate in good faith and may contract with respect to:

Any element of valuation or damages recognized by law as relevant to the amount of just compensation payable for the property;

The extent, term or nature of the property interest or other right to be acquired;

The quantity, location or boundary of the property;

The acquisition, removal, relocation or disposition of improvements upon the property and of personal property not sought to be taken;

The date of proposed entry and physical dispossession;

The time and method of payment of agreed compensation or other amounts authorized by law; and

Any other terms or conditions deemed appropriate by either of the parties.

Good faith negotiation shall include, but not be limited to, written notice of the following:

To the extent reasonably known at the time, the proposed project, the land proposed to be condemned, plan of work, operations and facilities in a manner sufficient to enable the condemnee to evaluate the effect of the proposed project, plan of work, operations and facilities on the condemnee’s use of the land;

The name, address, telephone number and, if available, facsimile number and electronic mail address of the condemnor and his designee, if any;

An initial written settlement offer that shall include:

A description of the general location and extent of the property sought, with sufficient detail for reasonable identification;

An offer that, at the condemnee’s request, a representative of the condemnor will tour the property sought with the condemnee or the condemnee’s representative at a mutually agreeable time prior to the deadline for the condemnee’s response to the initial written offer to discuss issues related to the property sought and the initial offer;

An estimate of the fair market value of the property sought and the general basis for such estimate;

A discussion of the reclamation planned by the condemnor for the property disturbed by the condemnor’s project;

An offer to acquire the property sought, allowing the condemnee up to sixty-five (65) days from the date the initial written offer was sent via certified mail to respond or make a counter-offer in writing; and

A written notice that the condemnee is under no obligation to accept the initial written offer but if the condemnee fails to respond to the initial written offer the right to object to the good faith of the condemnor may be waived under W.S. 1-26-510(a), that the condemnor and the condemnee are obligated to negotiate in good faith for the purchase of the property sought, that formal legal proceedings may be initiated if negotiations fail and that the condemnee has a right to seek advice from an attorney, real estate appraiser, or any other person of his choice during the negotiations and any subsequent legal proceedings.

A written response from the condemnor to any counter-offer made in writing by the condemnee to the initial written offer pursuant to subparagraph (iii)(E) of this subsection.

The written notice required under subsection (c) of this section shall be given to the condemnee of record as shown on the records in the county assessor’s office at the time, no less than ninety (90) days prior to commencement of a condemnation action.

The condemnor shall send by certified mail, return receipt requested, a notice of final offer at least fifteen (15) days prior to commencing a condemnation action.

A condemnee shall make reasonable and diligent efforts to negotiate in good faith with the condemnor including a timely written response to the written offer identified in subparagraph (c)(iii)(E) of this section, specifying areas of disagreement.

The condemnor shall reimburse the condemnee for all reasonable litigation expenses if a court finds the condemnor failed to negotiate in good faith as required under subsections (b) through (e) of this section, or to comply with any requirements of W.S. 1-26-504(a).

At any time in the negotiation, at the request of either party and upon mutual agreement, dispute resolution processes including mediation or arbitration may be employed or the informal procedures for resolving disputes established pursuant to W.S.

11-41-101

through

11-41-110

may be requested through the Wyoming agriculture and natural resource mediation board.

If a court or jury finds that the fair market value of the property sought by the condemnor is more than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the final offer required by subsection (e) of this section, the condemnor shall reimburse the condemnee for all reasonable litigation expenses incurred after the condemnee’s receipt of the final offer.

Attorney’s fees and other expenses awarded under this section from a public entity to a condemnee shall be reported by the public entity which paid the fees, to the Wyoming attorney general within sixty (60) days of the award. The Wyoming attorney general shall collect this data and report annually to the governor on the amount of all taxpayer funded fee awards, beginning July 31, 2014. The report shall identify the name of each party to whom an award was made, the name of each counsel of record representing each party to whom an award was made, the public agency which paid each award and the total amount of each award.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2; 2013 ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) substituted “may” for “shall” following “forbidden by law,” inserted “in good faith” following “negotiate” and inserted “may” preceding “contract with respect to”; in (b)(ii) inserted “, term” following “The extent” and inserted “or other right” preceding “to be acquired”; added (c) through (h).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (g), substituted “any requirements of W.S. 1-26-504(a)” for “ W.S. 1-26-504(a)(ii) and (iii)” and made a punctuation change, and added (j) and (k).

Good faith negotiation requirement not met.—

District court properly held that appellant failed to satisfy the good-faith negotiation requirement; while the 70 acres sought in the condemnation proceeding were contained within the roughly 2,100 acres addressed in appellant’s initial offer, appellee could not have known that it had the option to accept the offer only as to those 70 acres, and it was not at all clear that the discrete 70 acres were the subject of the negotiations. EOG Res., Inc. v. Floyd C. Reno & Sons, Inc., 2020 WY 95, 468 P.3d 667,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2020).

Requirements of initial offer.—

Type of property right sought to be acquired is one of several factors that could bear on whether an initial offer sufficiently described the property sought in a subsequent condemnation action; the property sought to be condemned is not required to be identical to the property described in the offer. Instead, there must be a sufficient resemblance between the two to allow a court to conclude that the subject of negotiation was clear to both parties and that the offer might have been accepted as it related to the property sought to be condemned. EOG Res., Inc. v. Floyd C. Reno & Sons, Inc., 2020 WY 95, 468 P.3d 667,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2020).

Attorney fees.—

As appellant failed to meet the standard for good faith negotiation, appellee was entitled to reimbursement and could submit a statement for attorney’s fees and costs incurred on appeal. EOG Res., Inc. v. Floyd C. Reno & Sons, Inc., 2020 WY 95, 468 P.3d 667,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2020).

Evidence sufficient to show compliance. —

District court did not err in finding the condemnor board of county commissioners met all the requirements of the eminent domain statutes in seeking to condemn part of the condemnees' land in connection with a water system for a reservoir's recreational facilities where the board presented evidence that: 1) the project was in the public interest and necessary; 2) the water benefited many uses in an area accessed by members of the general public and private individuals; 3) although there might be ways to relocate the water system, at that time its use in place was compatible with the greatest public good; and 4) the condemnees failed to show bad faith or abuse of discretion on the part of the board. Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

In a condemnation action by a non-public power company, the company negotiated in good faith with landowners as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann §§

1-26-509

,

1-26-510

where the company had great discretion with respect to the location of the transmission line and it attempted to accommodate owner concerns about location, especially early on in the negotiation process. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

Annual payments may be part of compensation

District court could consider evidence of comparable easements in determining just compensation for pipeline easements condemned by a carbon dioxide pipeline developer, but erroneously rejected some comparable easements on the basis that they were not the result of arms' length transactions or that they related to a natural gas pipeline. Further, annual payments were allowed as compensation.
Barlow Ranch, L.P. v. Greencore Pipeline Co. LLC, 2013 WY 34, 301 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-26-510.
Preliminary
efforts to purchase.

Except as provided in W.S.

1-26-511

, an action to condemn property may not be maintained over timely objection by the condemnee unless the condemnor made a good faith effort to acquire the property by purchase before commencing the action. A condemnee may not object to the good faith of the condemnor if the condemnee has failed to respond to an initial written offer as provided in W.S. 1-26-509(c)(iii)(E) and the condemnor has met the requirements of W.S. 1-26-509(c).

Negotiations conducted in substantial compliance with W.S. 1-26-509(b) through (e) are prima facie evidence of “good faith” by the condemnor under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) added last sentence; in (b) substituted “1-26-509(b) through (e)” for “1-26-509(b)(i) through (vi)” and inserted “by the condemnor” preceding “under subsection (a).”

Applied

in

Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Foianini v. Brinton, 855 P.2d 1238,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Wyo. Res. Corp. v. T-Chair Land Co., 2002 WY 104, 49 P.3d 999,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-26-511.
Purchase
efforts waived or excused.

A condemnor’s failure or inability substantially to comply with W.S.

1-26-509

and

1-26-510

does not bar the maintenance of a condemnation action, notwithstanding timely objection, if:

Compliance is waived by written agreement between the property owner and the condemnor;

One (1) or more of the owners of the property is unknown, cannot with reasonable diligence be contacted, is incapable of contracting and has no legal representative, or owns an interest which cannot be acquired by contract; or

Due to an emergency affecting public health or safety, there is a compelling need to avoid the delay in commencing the action which compliance would require.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iii) substituted “an emergency affecting public health or safety” for “conditions not caused by or under the control of the condemnor.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-26-512.
Contents of authorization.

A public entity may not commence a condemnation action until it has first adopted a written resolution in substantial conformity with this section, authorizing commencement and prosecution of the action. The authorization may be amended or rescinded at any time before or after commencement of the condemnation action but if rescinded the public entity shall pay the litigation expenses of the condemnee.

In addition to other requirements imposed by law, the condemnation authorization required by subsection (a) of this section shall include:

A general statement of the proposed public use for which the property is to be taken and a reference to the specific statute that authorizes the taking of the property by the condemnor;

A description of the general location and extent of the property to be taken, with sufficient detail for reasonable identification; and

A declaration that a taking of the described property is necessary and appropriate for the proposed public use.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.

Evidence sufficient to show compliance. —

District court did not err in finding the condemnor board of county commissioners met all the requirements of the eminent domain statutes in seeking to condemn part of the condemnees' land in connection with a water system for a reservoir's recreational facilities where the board presented evidence that: 1) the project was in the public interest and necessary; 2) the water benefited many uses in an area accessed by members of the general public and private individuals; 3) although there might be ways to relocate the water system, at that time its use in place was compatible with the greatest public good; and 4) the condemnees failed to show bad faith or abuse of discretion on the part of the board. Conner v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 148, 54 P.3d 1274,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2002).

Expenses not paid where resolution “amended.” —

This section requires payment of litigation expenses in the event of a “rescission” but not an “amendment” of a resolution authorizing condemnation. Board of County Comm'rs v. Atter, 734 P.2d 549,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 1-26-513.
Deposit at commencement of action.

At the time of commencing an eminent domain proceeding the condemnor shall deposit in court an amount equal to the condemnor’s last offer of settlement prior to the action. Upon motion of the condemnee and following a hearing if the amount originally deposited is clearly inadequate, the court shall order the condemnor to make an additional deposit. The clerk of court shall invest the deposit in any legal interest bearing investment and interest earnings shall accrue to the account of the condemnor.

The court may waive the requirement of a deposit for a public entity if the public entity is financially or legally unable to post the deposit but the public entity may not obtain possession of the property prior to judgment until the appropriate deposit is made.

The condemnee may withdraw any portion of the deposit prior to final judgment which the court determines is not subject to claims of mortgagees and other claimants. The amount withdrawn constitutes a lien against the property of the condemnee and the condemnee is liable to the condemnor for any amount withdrawn which exceeds the final judgment in the action. If the condemnee withdraws any portion of the deposit prior to judgment, he waives all defenses to the action except the right to contest the amount to be awarded and the condemnor is entitled to immediate possession of the property subject to the court’s determination of a reasonable period during which the condemnee can remove improvements and take other actions authorized by the court.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 1.